Illinois, session 104th, HB1768.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Public 5Safety and Justice Privacy Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Assistant Public Defender" and "Assistant State's 8Attorney" have the meanings given to those terms in Section 15 9of the Public Interest Attorney Assistance Act. 10    "Government agency", "personal information", "publicly 11available content", and "publicly post" or "publicly display" 12have the meanings given to those terms in 1-10 of Judicial 13Privacy Act.14    "Home address" includes an official's permanent residence 15and any secondary residences affirmatively identified by the 16official, but does not include an official's work address.17    "Immediate family" includes an official's spouse, child, 18parent, or any blood relative of the official or the 19official's spouse who lives in the same residence.20    "Law enforcement officer" has the meaning given to that 21term in Section 5 of the Law Enforcement Officer Bulletproof 22Vest Act.23    "Official" includes:  HB1768- 2 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1        (1) Law enforcement officers.2        (2) Prosecutors.3        (3) Public defenders.4        (4) Probation officers.5    "Probation officer" has the meaning given to that term in 6Section 9b of the Probation and Probation Officers Act.7    "Prosecutor" means a State's Attorney, Assistant State's 8Attorney, or a prosecutor for a unit of local government.9    "Public defender" means a Public Defender or an Assistant 10Public Defender.11    "Written request" means written notice signed by an 12official or a representative of the official's employer 13requesting a government agency, person, business, or 14association to refrain from posting or displaying publicly 15available content that includes the official's personal 16information.  17    Section 10. Publicly posting or displaying an official's 18personal information by government agencies.19    (a) Government agencies shall not publicly post or display 20publicly available content that includes an official's 21personal information, provided that the government agency has 22received a written request in accordance with Section 20 that 23it refrain from disclosing the official's personal 24information. After a government agency has received a written 25request, that agency shall remove the official's personal   HB1768- 3 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1information from publicly available content within 5 business 2days. After the government agency has removed the official's 3personal information from publicly available content, the 4agency shall not publicly post or display the information and 5the official's personal information shall be exempt from the 6Freedom of Information Act unless the government agency has 7received consent from the official to make the personal 8information available to the public.9    (b) If a government agency fails to comply with a written 10request to refrain from disclosing personal information, the 11official may bring an action in the circuit court seeking 12injunctive or declaratory relief. 13    Section 15. Publicly posting an official's personal 14information on the Internet by persons, businesses, and 15associations.16    (a) Prohibited Conduct.17        (1) All persons, businesses, and associations shall 18    refrain from publicly posting or displaying on the 19    Internet publicly available content that includes an 20    official's personal information, provided that the 21    official has made a written request to the person, 22    business, or association that it refrain from disclosing 23    the personal information.24        (2) No person, business, or association shall solicit, 25    sell, or trade on the Internet an official's personal   HB1768- 4 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    information with the intent to pose an imminent and 2    serious threat to the health and safety of the official or 3    the official's immediate family.4        (3) This subsection includes, but is not limited to, 5    Internet phone directories, Internet search engines, 6    Internet data aggregators, and Internet service providers.7    (b) Required Conduct.8        (1) After a person, business, or association has 9    received a written request from an official to protect the 10    privacy of the officer's personal information, that 11    person, business, or association shall have 72 hours to 12    remove the personal information from the Internet.13        (2) After a person, business, or association has 14    received a written request from an official, that person, 15    business, or association shall ensure that the official's 16    personal information is not made available on any website 17    or subsidiary website controlled by that person, business, 18    or association.19        (3) After receiving an official's written request, no 20    person, business, or association shall transfer the 21    official's personal information to any other person, 22    business, or association through any medium.23    (c) Redress. An official whose personal information is 24made public as a result of a violation of this Section may 25bring an action in the circuit court seeking injunctive or 26declaratory relief. If the court grants injunctive or   HB1768- 5 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1declaratory relief, the person, business, or association 2responsible for the violation shall be required to pay the 3official's costs and reasonable attorney's fees. 4    Section 20. Procedure for completing a written request. 5    (a) No government agency, person, business, or association 6shall be found to have violated any provision of this Act if 7the official fails to submit a written request calling for the 8protection of the officer's personal information.9    (b) A written request is valid if:10        (1) the official sends a written request directly to a 11    government agency, person, business, or association; or12        (2) the Secretary of State creates a policy and 13    procedure for an official to file the written request with 14    the Secretary of State to notify government agencies, the 15    official may send the written request to the Secretary of 16    State as provided in the policy and procedure. In each 17    quarter of a calendar year, the Secretary of State shall 18    provide a list of all officials who have submitted a 19    written request to it to the appropriate officer with 20    ultimate supervisory authority for a government agency. 21    The officer shall promptly provide a copy of the list to 22    any and all government agencies under his or her 23    supervision. Receipt of the written request list compiled 24    by the Secretary of State by a government agency shall 25    constitute a written request to that agency for the   HB1768- 6 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    purposes of this Act.2    (c) A representative from the official's employer may 3submit a written request on the official's behalf, provided 4that the official gives written consent to the representative 5and provided that the representative agrees to furnish a copy 6of that consent when a written request is made. The 7representative shall submit the written request as provided in 8subsection (b).9    (d) An official's written request shall specify what 10personal information shall be maintained private.11    If an official wishes to identify a secondary residence as 12a home address, the designation shall be made in the written 13request.14    An official shall disclose the identity of the officer's 15immediate family and indicate that the personal information of 16these family members shall also be excluded to the extent that 17it could reasonably be expected to reveal the personal 18information of the official.19    (e) An official's written request is valid until the 20official provides the government agency, person, business, or 21association with written permission to release the private 22information. An official's written request expires on death. 23    Section 25. Unlawful publication of personal information. 24    (a) It is unlawful for any person to knowingly publicly 25post on the Internet the personal information of an official   HB1768- 7 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1or of the official's immediate family if the person knows or 2reasonably should know that publicly posting the personal 3information poses an imminent and serious threat to the health 4and safety of the official or the official's immediate family 5and the violation is a proximate cause of bodily injury or 6death of the official or a member of the official's immediate 7family. A person who violates this Section is guilty of a Class 83 felony.9    (b) If an employee of a government agency has complied 10with the provisions of this Act, it is not a violation of 11subsection (a) if the employee publishes personal information, 12in good faith, on the website of the government agency in the 13ordinary course of carrying out public functions.  14    Section 30. Construction. This Act and any rules adopted 15to implement this Act shall be construed broadly to favor the 16protection of the personal information of officials.  17    Section 100. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 18changing Section 7 as follows: 19    (5 ILCS 140/7)20    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 21    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 22record that contains information that is exempt from 23disclosure under this Section, but also contains information   HB1768- 8 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 2to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 3shall make the remaining information available for inspection 4and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 5be exempt from inspection and copying: 6        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 7    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 8    regulations implementing federal or State law. 9        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 10    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 11    or a court order. 12        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 13    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 14    specifically designed to provide information to one or 15    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 16    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 17        (c) Personal information contained within public 18    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 19    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 20    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 21    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 22    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 23    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 24    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 25    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 26    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information   HB1768- 9 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 2    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 3    privacy. 4        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 5    created in the course of administrative enforcement 6    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 7    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 8    extent that disclosure would: 9            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 10        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 11        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 12        agency that is the recipient of the request; 13            (ii) interfere with active administrative 14        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 15        that is the recipient of the request; 16            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 17        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 18        hearing; 19            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 20        confidential source, confidential information 21        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 22        who file complaints with or provide information to 23        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 24        penal agencies; except that the identities of 25        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 26        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of   HB1768- 10 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1        local government, except when disclosure would 2        interfere with an active criminal investigation 3        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 4        request; 5            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 6        techniques other than those generally used and known 7        or disclose internal documents of correctional 8        agencies related to detection, observation, or 9        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 10        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 11        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 12        request; 13            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 14        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 15            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 16        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 17        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 18    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 19    record management system if the law enforcement agency 20    that is the recipient of the request did not create the 21    record, did not participate in or have a role in any of the 22    events which are the subject of the record, and only has 23    access to the record through the shared electronic record 24    management system. 25        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 26    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police   HB1768- 11 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 2    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 3    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 4    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 5    Board. 6        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 7    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 8    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 9        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 10    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 11        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 12    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 13    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 14    materials are available in the library of the correctional 15    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 16    confined. 17        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 18    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 19    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 20    materials include records from staff members' personnel 21    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 22    information. 23        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 24    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 25    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 26    through an administrative request to the Department of   HB1768- 12 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 2    Mental Health. 3        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 4    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 5    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 6    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 7    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 8    institution or facility.9        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 10    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 11    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 12    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 13    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 14    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 15    or school address, work telephone number, social security 16    number, or any other identifying information, except as 17    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 18    or claim. 19        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 20    requested by a person committed to the Department of 21    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 22    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 23    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 24    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 25    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 26    claim.   HB1768- 13 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 2    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 3    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 4    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 5    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 6    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 7    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 8    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 9    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 10        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 11    information obtained from a person or business where the 12    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 13    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 14    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 15    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 16    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 17    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 18    requested.19        The information included under this exemption includes 20    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 21    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 22    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 23    company within the investment portfolio of a private 24    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 25    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 26    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply   HB1768- 14 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 2    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 3    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 4    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 5    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 6    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 7    privately held company may cause competitive harm.8        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 9    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 10    to disclosure. 11        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 12    agreement, including information which if it were 13    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 14    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 15    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 16    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 17    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 18    award or final selection is made. 19        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 20    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 21    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 22    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 23    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 24    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 25    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 26    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only   HB1768- 15 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 2    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 3    legal rights of the general public. 4        (j) The following information pertaining to 5    educational matters:6            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 7        examination data used to administer an academic 8        examination; 9            (ii) information received by a primary or 10        secondary school, college, or university under its 11        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 12        their academic peers; 13            (iii) information concerning a school or 14        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 15        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 16        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and17            (iv) course materials or research materials used 18        by faculty members. 19        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 20    submissions, and other construction related technical 21    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 22    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 23    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 24    including, but not limited to, power generating and 25    distribution stations and other transmission and 26    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities,   HB1768- 16 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 2    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 3    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 4    security. 5        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 6    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 7    public body makes the minutes available to the public 8    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 9        (m) Communications between a public body and an 10    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 11    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 12    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 13    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 14    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 15    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 16    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 17        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 18    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 19    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 20    cases in which discipline is imposed. 21        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 22    with automated data processing operations, including, but 23    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 24    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 25    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 26    pertaining to all logical and physical design of   HB1768- 17 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 2    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 3    security of the system or its data or the security of 4    materials exempt under this Section. 5        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 6    between public bodies and their employees or 7    representatives, except that any final contract or 8    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 9        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 10    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 11    an applicant for a license or employment. 12        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 13    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 14    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 15    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 16    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 17    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 18    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 19    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 20    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 21    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 22    until a sale is consummated. 23        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 24    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 25    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 26    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool.   HB1768- 18 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 2    intergovernmental risk management association or 3    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 4    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 5        (t) Information contained in or related to 6    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 7    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 8    for the regulation or supervision of financial 9    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 10    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 11    law. 12        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 13    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 14    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 15    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 16    Electronic Transactions Act. 17        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 18    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 19    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 20    community's population or systems, facilities, or 21    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 22    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 23    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 24    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 25    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 26    include such things as details pertaining to the   HB1768- 19 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 2    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 3    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 4        (w) (Blank). 5        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 6    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 7    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 8    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 9    Illinois Power Agency. 10        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 11    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 12    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 13    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 14    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 15    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 16    Commission. 17        (z) Information about students exempted from 18    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 19    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 20    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 21    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 22    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 23        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 24    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 25        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 26    review team and records maintained by a mortality review   HB1768- 20 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 2    Mortality Review Team Act. 3        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 4    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 5    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 6    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.7        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 8    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 9    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 10    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 11        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 12    information of persons who are minors and are also 13    participants and registrants in programs of park 14    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 15    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 16    associations.17        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 18    information of participants and registrants in programs of 19    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 20    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 21    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 22    minors.23        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 24    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 25    2012. 26        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of   HB1768- 21 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 2    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 3    School Code and any information contained in that report. 4        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 5    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 6    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 7    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 8    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 9    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 10    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 11    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 12    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 13    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 14    Corrections.15        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 16    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 17        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 18    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 19    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 20    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 21    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 22    of a governmental entity or a person. 23        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 24    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 25    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 26    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in   HB1768- 22 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    the procedure.2        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 3    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 4    Confidential Reporting Act. 5        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 6    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 7    Act. 8        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 9    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 10        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 11    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 12    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 13    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 14    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 15    Act.16        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 17    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 18        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 19    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 20        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 21    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 22    protected health information, including demographic 23    information, that may be contained within or extracted 24    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 25    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 26    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance   HB1768- 23 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 2    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 3    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 4    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 5    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 6    160.103. 7        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 8    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 9    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 10    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 11    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 12Judicial Privacy Act and the Public Safety and Justice Privacy 13Act shall be redacted from public records prior to disclosure 14under this Act. 15    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 16public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 17agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 18behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 19governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 20Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 21for purposes of this Act. 22    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 23information or limit the availability of records to the 24public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 25in this Act. 26(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21;   HB1768- 24 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 21-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, 3eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 4103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 58-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 6eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.) 7    Section 105. The Election Code is amended by adding 8Section 10-10.3 as follows: 9    (10 ILCS 5/10-10.3 new)10    Sec. 10-10.3. Removal of an official's address information 11from the certificate of nomination or nomination papers.12    (a) As used in this Section, "home address" and "official" 13have the meanings given to those terms in Section 5 of the 14Public Safety and Justice Privacy Act.15    (b) Upon expiration of the period for filing an objection 16to an official's certificate of nomination or nomination 17papers, an official who is a candidate may file a written 18request with the State Board of Elections for redaction of the 19official's home address information from his or her 20certificate of nomination or nomination papers. After receipt 21of the official's written request, the State Board of 22Elections shall redact or cause redaction of the official's 23home address from his or her certificate of nomination or 24nomination papers within 5 business days.  HB1768- 25 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    (c) Prior to expiration of the period for filing an 2objection to an official's certificate of nomination or 3nomination papers, the home address information from the 4certificate of nomination or nomination papers of an official 5who is a candidate is available for public inspection. After 6redaction of an official's home address information under 7subsection (b), the home address information is only available 8for an in camera inspection by the court reviewing an 9objection to the official's certificate of nomination or 10nomination papers. 11    Section 110. The Illinois Identification Card Act is 12amended by changing Sections 4 and 5 as follows: 13    (15 ILCS 335/4)14    Sec. 4. Identification card. 15    (a) In accordance with the requirements of this Section, 16the Secretary of State shall issue a standard Illinois 17Identification Card, as well as a mobile Illinois 18Identification Card, to any natural person who is a resident 19of the State of Illinois who applies for such a card, or 20renewal thereof. No identification card shall be issued to any 21person who holds a valid foreign state identification card, 22license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to the 23Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 24card, license, or permit. The card shall be prepared and   HB1768- 26 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1supplied by the Secretary of State and shall include a 2photograph and signature or mark of the applicant. However, 3the Secretary of State may provide by rule for the issuance of 4Illinois Identification Cards without photographs if the 5applicant has a bona fide religious objection to being 6photographed or to the display of his or her photograph. The 7Illinois Identification Card may be used for identification 8purposes in any lawful situation only by the person to whom it 9was issued. As used in this Act, "photograph" means any color 10photograph or digitally produced and captured image of an 11applicant for an identification card. As used in this Act, 12"signature" means the name of a person as written by that 13person and captured in a manner acceptable to the Secretary of 14State.15    (a-5) If an applicant for an identification card has a 16current driver's license or instruction permit issued by the 17Secretary of State, the Secretary may require the applicant to 18utilize the same residence address and name on the 19identification card, driver's license, and instruction permit 20records maintained by the Secretary. The Secretary may 21promulgate rules to implement this provision. 22    (a-10) If the applicant is a judicial officer as defined 23in Section 1-10 of the Judicial Privacy Act, an official as 24defined in Section 5 of the Public Safety and Justice Privacy 25Act, or a peace officer, the applicant may elect to have his or 26her office or work address listed on the card instead of the   HB1768- 27 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1applicant's residence or mailing address. The Secretary may 2promulgate rules to implement this provision. For the purposes 3of this subsection (a-10), "peace officer" means any person 4who by virtue of his or her office or public employment is 5vested by law with a duty to maintain public order or to make 6arrests for a violation of any penal statute of this State, 7whether that duty extends to all violations or is limited to 8specific violations. 9    (a-15) The Secretary of State may provide for an expedited 10process for the issuance of an Illinois Identification Card. 11The Secretary shall charge an additional fee for the expedited 12issuance of an Illinois Identification Card, to be set by 13rule, not to exceed $75. All fees collected by the Secretary 14for expedited Illinois Identification Card service shall be 15deposited into the Secretary of State Special Services Fund. 16The Secretary may adopt rules regarding the eligibility, 17process, and fee for an expedited Illinois Identification 18Card. If the Secretary of State determines that the volume of 19expedited identification card requests received on a given day 20exceeds the ability of the Secretary to process those requests 21in an expedited manner, the Secretary may decline to provide 22expedited services, and the additional fee for the expedited 23service shall be refunded to the applicant. 24    (a-20) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 25Illinois Identification Card to a person committed to the 26Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice,   HB1768- 28 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 2county jail or county department of corrections as follows: if 3the person has a social security number,4        (1) A committed person who has previously held an 5    Illinois Identification Card or an Illinois driver's 6    license shall submit an Identification Card verification 7    form to the Secretary of State, including a photograph 8    taken by the correctional facility, proof of residency 9    upon discharge, and a social security number, if the 10    committed person has a social security number. If the 11    committed person does not have a social security number 12    and is eligible for a social security number, the 13    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 14    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 15    social security number. If the committed person's 16    photograph and demographic information matches an existing 17    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 18    and the Secretary of State verifies the applicant's social 19    security number with the Social Security Administration, 20    the Secretary of State shall issue the committed person a 21    standard Illinois Identification Card. If the photograph 22    or demographic information matches an existing Illinois 23    Identification Card or Illinois driver's license in 24    another person's name or identity, a standard Illinois 25    Identification Card shall not be issued until the 26    committed person submits a certified birth certificate and   HB1768- 29 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    social security card to the Secretary of State and the 2    Secretary of State verifies the identity of the committed 3    person. If the Secretary of State cannot find a match to an 4    existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's 5    license, the committed person may apply for a standard 6    Illinois Identification card as described in paragraph 7    (2).8        (2) A committed person who has not previously held an 9    Illinois Identification Card or Illinois driver's license 10    or for whom a match cannot be found as described in 11    paragraph (1) shall submit an Illinois Identification Card 12    verification form, including a photograph taken by the 13    correctional facility, a certified birth certificate, 14    proof of residency upon discharge, and a social security 15    number, if the committed has a social security number. If 16    the committed person does not have a social security 17    number and is eligible for a social security number, the 18    Secretary of State shall not issue a standard Illinois 19    Identification Card until the committed person obtains a 20    social security number. If the Secretary of State verifies 21    the applicant's social security number with the Social 22    Security Administration, the Secretary of State shall 23    issue the committed person a standard Illinois 24    Identification Card.25    The Illinois Identification Card verification form 26described in this subsection shall be prescribed by the   HB1768- 30 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1Secretary of State. The Secretary of State and correctional 2facilities in this State shall establish a secure method to 3transfer the form.4    (a-25) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 5Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a committed 6person upon release on parole, mandatory supervised release, 7aftercare release, final discharge, or pardon from the 8Department of Corrections, the Department of Juvenile Justice, 9a Federal Bureau of Prisons facility located in Illinois, or a 10county jail or county department of corrections, if the 11released person does not obtain a standard Illinois 12Identification Card as described in subsection (a-20) prior to 13release but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 14Identification Card verification form completed by the 15correctional facility, verifying the released person's date of 16birth, social security number, if the person has a social 17security number, and his or her Illinois residence address. 18The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 19days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 20Identification Card.21    Prior to the expiration of the 90-day period of the 22limited-term Illinois Identification Card, if the released 23person submits to the Secretary of State a certified copy of 24his or her birth certificate and his or her social security 25card, if the person has a social security number, or other 26documents authorized by the Secretary, a standard Illinois   HB1768- 31 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1Identification Card shall be issued. A limited-term Illinois 2Identification Card may not be renewed. 3    This subsection shall not apply to a released person who 4was unable to obtain a standard Illinois Identification Card 5because his or her photograph or demographic information 6matched an existing Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 7driver's license in another person's name or identity or to a 8released person who does not have a social security number and 9is eligible for a social security number.10    (a-30) The Secretary of State shall issue a standard 11Illinois Identification Card to a person upon conditional 12release or absolute discharge from the custody of the 13Department of Human Services, if the person presents a 14certified copy of his or her birth certificate, social 15security card, if the person has a social security number, or 16other documents authorized by the Secretary, and a document 17proving his or her Illinois residence address. The Secretary 18of State shall issue a standard Illinois Identification Card 19to a person prior to his or her conditional release or absolute 20discharge if personnel from the Department of Human Services 21bring the person to a Secretary of State location with the 22required documents. Documents proving residence address may 23include any official document of the Department of Human 24Services showing the person's address after release and a 25Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which may be 26executed by personnel of the Department of Human Services.  HB1768- 32 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    (a-35) The Secretary of State shall issue a limited-term 2Illinois Identification Card valid for 90 days to a person 3upon conditional release or absolute discharge from the 4custody of the Department of Human Services, if the person is 5unable to present a certified copy of his or her birth 6certificate and social security card, if the person has a 7social security number, or other documents authorized by the 8Secretary, but does present a Secretary of State prescribed 9verification form completed by the Department of Human 10Services, verifying the person's date of birth and social 11security number, if the person has a social security number, 12and a document proving his or her Illinois residence address. 13The verification form must have been completed no more than 30 14days prior to the date of application for the Illinois 15Identification Card. The Secretary of State shall issue a 16limited-term Illinois Identification Card to a person no 17sooner than 14 days prior to his or her conditional release or 18absolute discharge if personnel from the Department of Human 19Services bring the person to a Secretary of State location 20with the required documents. Documents proving residence 21address shall include any official document of the Department 22of Human Services showing the person's address after release 23and a Secretary of State prescribed verification form, which 24may be executed by personnel of the Department of Human 25Services. 26    (b) The Secretary of State shall issue a special Illinois   HB1768- 33 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1Identification Card, which shall be known as an Illinois 2Person with a Disability Identification Card, to any natural 3person who is a resident of the State of Illinois, who is a 4person with a disability as defined in Section 4A of this Act, 5who applies for such card, or renewal thereof. No Illinois 6Person with a Disability Identification Card shall be issued 7to any person who holds a valid foreign state identification 8card, license, or permit unless the person first surrenders to 9the Secretary of State the valid foreign state identification 10card, license, or permit. The Secretary of State shall charge 11no fee to issue such card. The card shall be prepared and 12supplied by the Secretary of State, and shall include a 13photograph and signature or mark of the applicant, a 14designation indicating that the card is an Illinois Person 15with a Disability Identification Card, and shall include a 16comprehensible designation of the type and classification of 17the applicant's disability as set out in Section 4A of this 18Act. However, the Secretary of State may provide by rule for 19the issuance of Illinois Person with a Disability 20Identification Cards without photographs if the applicant has 21a bona fide religious objection to being photographed or to 22the display of his or her photograph. If the applicant so 23requests, the card shall include a description of the 24applicant's disability and any information about the 25applicant's disability or medical history which the Secretary 26determines would be helpful to the applicant in securing   HB1768- 34 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1emergency medical care. If a mark is used in lieu of a 2signature, such mark shall be affixed to the card in the 3presence of 2 two witnesses who attest to the authenticity of 4the mark. The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification 5Card may be used for identification purposes in any lawful 6situation by the person to whom it was issued.7    The Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 8may be used as adequate documentation of disability in lieu of 9a physician's determination of disability, a determination of 10disability from a physician assistant, a determination of 11disability from an advanced practice registered nurse, or any 12other documentation of disability whenever any State law 13requires that a person with a disability provide such 14documentation of disability, however an Illinois Person with a 15Disability Identification Card shall not qualify the 16cardholder to participate in any program or to receive any 17benefit which is not available to all persons with like 18disabilities. Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, an 19Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card, or 20evidence that the Secretary of State has issued an Illinois 21Person with a Disability Identification Card, shall not be 22used by any person other than the person named on such card to 23prove that the person named on such card is a person with a 24disability or for any other purpose unless the card is used for 25the benefit of the person named on such card, and the person 26named on such card consents to such use at the time the card is   HB1768- 35 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1so used.2    An optometrist's determination of a visual disability 3under Section 4A of this Act is acceptable as documentation 4for the purpose of issuing an Illinois Person with a 5Disability Identification Card. 6    When medical information is contained on an Illinois 7Person with a Disability Identification Card, the Office of 8the Secretary of State shall not be liable for any actions 9taken based upon that medical information.10    (c) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 11original or renewal Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 12Person with a Disability Identification Card issued to a 13person under the age of 21 shall be of a distinct nature from 14those Illinois Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a 15Disability Identification Cards issued to individuals 21 years 16of age or older. The color designated for Illinois 17Identification Cards or Illinois Person with a Disability 18Identification Cards for persons under the age of 21 shall be 19at the discretion of the Secretary of State.20    (c-1) Each original or renewal Illinois Identification 21Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card 22issued to a person under the age of 21 shall display the date 23upon which the person becomes 18 years of age and the date upon 24which the person becomes 21 years of age.25    (c-3) The General Assembly recognizes the need to identify 26military veterans living in this State for the purpose of   HB1768- 36 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1ensuring that they receive all of the services and benefits to 2which they are legally entitled, including healthcare, 3education assistance, and job placement. To assist the State 4in identifying these veterans and delivering these vital 5services and benefits, the Secretary of State is authorized to 6issue Illinois Identification Cards and Illinois Person with a 7Disability Identification Cards with the word "veteran" 8appearing on the face of the cards. This authorization is 9predicated on the unique status of veterans. The Secretary may 10not issue any other identification card which identifies an 11occupation, status, affiliation, hobby, or other unique 12characteristics of the identification card holder which is 13unrelated to the purpose of the identification card.14    (c-5) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, the Secretary 15of State shall designate a space on each original or renewal 16identification card where, at the request of the applicant, 17the word "veteran" shall be placed. The veteran designation 18shall be available to a person identified as a veteran under 19subsection (b) of Section 5 of this Act who was discharged or 20separated under honorable conditions. 21    (d) The Secretary of State may issue a Senior Citizen 22discount card, to any natural person who is a resident of the 23State of Illinois who is 60 years of age or older and who 24applies for such a card or renewal thereof. The Secretary of 25State shall charge no fee to issue such card. The card shall be 26issued in every county and applications shall be made   HB1768- 37 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1available at, but not limited to, nutrition sites, senior 2citizen centers and Area Agencies on Aging. The applicant, 3upon receipt of such card and prior to its use for any purpose, 4shall have affixed thereon in the space provided therefor his 5signature or mark.6    (e) The Secretary of State, in his or her discretion, may 7designate on each Illinois Identification Card or Illinois 8Person with a Disability Identification Card a space where the 9card holder may place a sticker or decal, issued by the 10Secretary of State, of uniform size as the Secretary may 11specify, that shall indicate in appropriate language that the 12card holder has renewed his or her Illinois Identification 13Card or Illinois Person with a Disability Identification Card.14    (f)(1) The Secretary of State may issue a mobile 15identification card to an individual who is otherwise eligible 16to hold a physical credential in addition to, and not instead 17of, an identification card if the Secretary of State has 18issued an identification card to the person. The data elements 19that are used to build an electronic credential must match the 20individual's current Department record.21    (2) The Secretary may enter into agreements or contract 22with an agency of the State, another state, the United States, 23or a third party to facilitate the issuance, use, and 24verification of a mobile identification card issued by the 25Secretary or another state.26    (3) Any mobile identification card issued by the Secretary   HB1768- 38 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1shall be in accordance with the most recent AAMVA standards.2    (4) The Secretary shall design the mobile identification 3card in a manner that allows the credential holder to maintain 4physical possession of the device on which the mobile 5identification card is accessed during verification.6    (g) The verification process shall be implemented to 7require:8        (1) the relying parties to authenticate electronic 9    credentials in accordance with applicable AAMVA standards 10    prior to acceptance of the electronic credential;11        (2) the Secretary to ensure that electronic credential 12    data is subject to all jurisdictional data security and 13    privacy protection laws and regulations; and14        (3) the relying parties to request only electronic 15    credential data elements that are necessary to complete 16    the transaction for which data is being requested.17    (h) Privacy and tracking of data shall be restricted by 18implementing the following requirements:19        (1) the relying parties shall retain only electronic 20    credential data elements for which the relying party 21    explicitly obtained consent from the electronic credential 22    holder and shall inform the electronic credential holder 23    of the use and retention period of the electronic data 24    elements;25        (2) the Secretary shall use an electronic credential 26    system that is designed to maximize the privacy of the   HB1768- 39 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    credential holder in accordance with State and federal law 2    and shall not track or compile information without the 3    credential holder's consent; and4        (3) the Department shall only compile and disclose 5    information regarding the use of the credential as 6    required by State or federal law.7    (i)(1) The electronic credential holder shall be required 8to have the holder's their physical credential on the holder's 9their person for all purposes for which an identification card 10is required. No person, public entity, private entity, or 11agency shall establish a policy that requires an electronic 12credential instead of a physical credential.13    (2) Electronic credential systems shall be designed so 14that there is no requirement for the electronic credential 15holder to display or relinquish possession of the credential 16holder's mobile device to relying parties for the acceptance 17of an electronic credential.18    (3) When required by law and upon request by law 19enforcement, a credential holder must provide the credential 20holder's physical credential.21    (4) Any law or regulation that requires an individual to 22surrender the individual's their physical credential to law 23enforcement does not apply to the device on which an 24electronic credential has been provisioned.25    (j) A person may be required to produce when so requested a 26physical identification card to a law enforcement officer, a   HB1768- 40 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1representative of a State or federal department or agency, or 2a private entity and is subject to all applicable laws and 3consequences for failure to produce such an identification 4card.5    (k) The Secretary of State shall adopt such rules as are 6necessary to implement a mobile identification card.7    (l) The display of a mobile identification card shall not 8serve as consent or authorization for a law enforcement 9officer, or any other person, to search, view, or access any 10other data or application on the mobile device. If a person 11presents the person's mobile device to a law enforcement 12officer for purposes of displaying a mobile identification 13card, the law enforcement officer shall promptly return the 14mobile device to the person once the officer has had an 15opportunity to verify the identity of the person. Except for 16willful and wanton misconduct, any law enforcement officer, 17court, or officer of the court presented with the device shall 18be immune from any liability resulting from damage to the 19mobile device.20    (m) The fee to install the application to display a mobile 21identification card as defined in this subsection shall not 22exceed $6.23    (n) As used in this Section:24    "AAMVA" means the American Association of Motor Vehicle 25Administrators.26    "Credential" means a driver's license, learner's permit,   HB1768- 41 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1or identification card.2    "Credential holder" means the individual to whom a mobile 3driver's license or a mobile identification card is issued.4    "Data element" means a distinct component of a customer's 5information that is found on the Department's customer record.6    "Department" means the Secretary of State Department of 7Driver Services.8    "Electronic credential" means an electronic extension of 9the departmental issued physical credential that conveys 10identity and complies with AAMVA's mobile driver license 11Implementation guidelines and the ISO/IEC 18013-5 standard.12    "Electronic credential system" means a digital process 13that includes a method for provisioning electronic 14credentials, requesting and transmitting electronic credential 15data elements, and performing tasks to maintain the system.16    "Full profile" means all the information provided on an 17identification card.18    "ISO" means the International Organization for 19Standardization, which creates uniform processes and 20procedures. 21    "Limited profile" means a portion of the information 22provided on an Identification Card.23    "Mobile identification card" means a data file that is 24available on any mobile device that has connectivity to the 25Internet through an application that allows the mobile device 26to download the data file from the Secretary of State, that   HB1768- 42 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1contains all the data elements visible on the face and back of 2an identification card, and that displays the current status 3of the identification card. "Mobile identification card" does 4not include a copy, photograph, or image of an Illinois 5Identification Card that is not downloaded through the 6application on a mobile device.7    "Physical credential" means a Department-issued Department 8issued document that conveys identity in accordance with the 9Illinois Identification Card Act.10    "Provision" means the initial loading of an electronic 11credential onto a device.12    "Relying party" means the entity to which the credential 13holder presents the electronic credential.14    "Verification process" means a method of authenticating 15the electronic credential through the use of secured 16encryption communication. 17    (o) (f) Upon providing the required documentation, at the 18request of the applicant, the identification card may reflect 19Gold Star Family designation. The Secretary shall designate a 20space on each original or renewal of an identification card 21for such designation. This designation shall be available to a 22person eligible for Gold Star license plates under subsection 23(f) of Section 6-106 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 24(Source: P.A. 102-299, eff. 8-6-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 25103-345, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-782, eff. 268-6-24; 103-824, eff. 1-1-25; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; revised   HB1768- 43 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b111-26-24.) 2    (15 ILCS 335/5)3    Sec. 5. Applications. 4    (a) Any natural person who is a resident of the State of 5Illinois may file an application for an identification card, 6or for the renewal thereof, in a manner prescribed by the 7Secretary. Each original application shall be completed by the 8applicant in full and shall set forth the legal name, 9residence address and zip code, social security number, if the 10person has a social security number, birth date, sex and a 11brief description of the applicant. The applicant shall be 12photographed, unless the Secretary of State has provided by 13rule for the issuance of identification cards without 14photographs and the applicant is deemed eligible for an 15identification card without a photograph under the terms and 16conditions imposed by the Secretary of State, and he or she 17shall also submit any other information as the Secretary may 18deem necessary or such documentation as the Secretary may 19require to determine the identity of the applicant. In 20addition to the residence address, the Secretary may allow the 21applicant to provide a mailing address. If the applicant is an 22employee of the Department of Children and Family Services 23with a job title of "Child Protection Specialist Trainee", 24"Child Protection Specialist", "Child Protection Advanced 25Specialist", "Child Welfare Specialist Trainee", "Child   HB1768- 44 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1Welfare Specialist", or "Child Welfare Advanced Specialist" or 2a judicial officer as defined in Section 1-10 of the Judicial 3Privacy Act, an official as defined in Section 5 of the Public 4Safety and Justice Privacy Act, or a peace officer, the 5applicant may elect to have his or her office or work address 6in lieu of the applicant's residence or mailing address. An 7applicant for an Illinois Person with a Disability 8Identification Card must also submit with each original or 9renewal application, on forms prescribed by the Secretary, 10such documentation as the Secretary may require, establishing 11that the applicant is a "person with a disability" as defined 12in Section 4A of this Act, and setting forth the applicant's 13type and class of disability as set forth in Section 4A of this 14Act. For the purposes of this subsection (a), "peace officer" 15means any person who by virtue of his or her office or public 16employment is vested by law with a duty to maintain public 17order or to make arrests for a violation of any penal statute 18of this State, whether that duty extends to all violations or 19is limited to specific violations. 20    (a-5) Upon the first issuance of a request for proposals 21for a digital driver's license and identification card 22issuance and facial recognition system issued after January 1, 232020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-513), and upon 24implementation of a new or revised system procured pursuant to 25that request for proposals, the Secretary shall permit 26applicants to choose between "male", "female", or "non-binary"   HB1768- 45 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1when designating the applicant's sex on the identification 2card application form. The sex designated by the applicant 3shall be displayed on the identification card issued to the 4applicant. 5    (b) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, for each original 6or renewal identification card application under this Act, the 7Secretary shall inquire as to whether the applicant is a 8veteran for purposes of issuing an identification card with a 9veteran designation under subsection (c-5) of Section 4 of 10this Act. The acceptable forms of proof shall include, but are 11not limited to, Department of Defense form DD-214, Department 12of Defense form DD-256 for applicants who did not receive a 13form DD-214 upon the completion of initial basic training, 14Department of Defense form DD-2 (Retired), an identification 15card issued under the federal Veterans Identification Card Act 16of 2015, or a United States Department of Veterans Affairs 17summary of benefits letter. If the document cannot be stamped, 18the Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs shall provide a 19certificate to the veteran to provide to the Secretary of 20State. The Illinois Department of Veterans' Affairs shall 21advise the Secretary as to what other forms of proof of a 22person's status as a veteran are acceptable.23    For each applicant who is issued an identification card 24with a veteran designation, the Secretary shall provide the 25Department of Veterans' Affairs with the applicant's name, 26address, date of birth, gender, and such other demographic   HB1768- 46 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1information as agreed to by the Secretary and the Department. 2The Department may take steps necessary to confirm the 3applicant is a veteran. If after due diligence, including 4writing to the applicant at the address provided by the 5Secretary, the Department is unable to verify the applicant's 6veteran status, the Department shall inform the Secretary, who 7shall notify the applicant that he or she must confirm status 8as a veteran, or the identification card will be canceled 9cancelled. 10    For purposes of this subsection (b):11    "Armed forces" means any of the Armed Forces of the United 12States, including a member of any reserve component or 13National Guard unit. 14    "Veteran" means a person who has served in the armed 15forces and was discharged or separated under honorable 16conditions. 17    (b-1) An applicant who is eligible for Gold Star license 18plates under Section 3-664 of the Illinois Vehicle Code may 19apply for an identification card with space for a designation 20as a Gold Star Family. The Secretary may waive any fee for this 21application. If the Secretary does not waive the fee, any fee 22charged to the applicant must be deposited into the Illinois 23Veterans Assistance Fund. The Secretary is authorized to issue 24rules to implement this subsection. 25    (c) All applicants for REAL ID compliant standard Illinois 26Identification Cards and Illinois Person with a Disability   HB1768- 47 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1Identification Cards shall provide proof of lawful status in 2the United States as defined in 6 CFR 37.3, as amended. 3Applicants who are unable to provide the Secretary with proof 4of lawful status are ineligible for REAL ID compliant 5identification cards under this Act.6    (d) The Secretary of State may accept, as proof of date of 7birth and written signature for any applicant for a standard 8identification card who does not have a social security number 9or documentation issued by the United States Department of 10Homeland Security authorizing the applicant's presence in this 11country, any passport validly issued to the applicant from the 12applicant's country of citizenship or a consular 13identification document validly issued to the applicant by a 14consulate of that country as defined in Section 5 of the 15Consular Identification Document Act. Any such documents must 16be either unexpired or presented by an applicant within 2 17years of its expiration date. 18(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 19103-888, eff. 8-9-24; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; revised 12-1-24.) 20    Section 115. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 21changing Sections 3-405, 6-106, and 6-110 as follows: 22    (625 ILCS 5/3-405)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 3-405)23    Sec. 3-405. Application for registration. 24    (a) Every owner of a vehicle subject to registration under   HB1768- 48 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1this Code shall make application to the Secretary of State for 2the registration of such vehicle upon the appropriate form or 3forms furnished by the Secretary. Every such original 4application shall bear the signature of the owner written with 5pen and ink and contain:6        1. The name, domicile address, as defined in Section 7    1-115.5 of this Code, (except as otherwise provided in 8    this paragraph 1), mail address of the owner or business 9    address of the owner if a firm, association, or 10    corporation, and, if available, email address of the 11    owner. If the mailing address is a post office box number, 12    the address listed on the driver license record may be 13    used to verify residence. A police officer, a deputy 14    sheriff, an elected sheriff, a law enforcement officer for 15    the Illinois State Police, a fire investigator, a state's 16    attorney, an assistant state's attorney, a state's 17    attorney special investigator, an official, or a judicial 18    officer may elect to furnish the address of the 19    headquarters of the governmental entity, police district, 20    or business address where he or she works instead of his or 21    her domicile address, in which case that address shall be 22    deemed to be his or her domicile address for all purposes 23    under this Chapter 3. The spouse and children of a person 24    who may elect under this paragraph 1 to furnish the 25    address of the headquarters of the government entity, 26    police district, or business address where the person   HB1768- 49 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    works instead of the person's domicile address may, if 2    they reside with that person, also elect to furnish the 3    address of the headquarters of the government entity, 4    police district, or business address where the person 5    works as their domicile address, in which case that 6    address shall be deemed to be their domicile address for 7    all purposes under this Chapter 3. In this paragraph 1: 8    (A) "police officer" has the meaning ascribed to 9    "policeman" in Section 10-3-1 of the Illinois Municipal 10    Code; (B) "deputy sheriff" means a deputy sheriff 11    appointed under Section 3-6008 of the Counties Code; (C) 12    "elected sheriff" means a sheriff commissioned pursuant to 13    Section 3-6001 of the Counties Code; (D) "fire 14    investigator" means a person classified as a peace officer 15    under the Peace Officer Fire Investigation Act; (E) 16    "state's attorney", "assistant state's attorney", and 17    "state's attorney special investigator" mean a state's 18    attorney, assistant state's attorney, and state's attorney 19    special investigator commissioned or appointed under 20    Division 3-9 of the Counties Code; and (F) "judicial 21    officer" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 1-10 of 22    the Judicial Privacy Act; and (G) "official" has the 23    meaning ascribed to it in Section 5 of the Public Safety 24    and Justice Privacy Act.25        2. A description of the vehicle, including such 26    information as is required in an application for a   HB1768- 50 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    certificate of title, determined under such standard 2    rating as may be prescribed by the Secretary.3        3. (Blank). 4        3.5. A space for a voluntary disclosure of a condition 5    that impedes effective communication under Section 6    3-405.5. 7        4. Such further information as may reasonably be 8    required by the Secretary to enable him to determine 9    whether the vehicle is lawfully entitled to registration 10    and the owner entitled to a certificate of title.11        5. An affirmation by the applicant that all 12    information set forth is true and correct. If the 13    application is for the registration of a motor vehicle, 14    the applicant also shall affirm that the motor vehicle is 15    insured as required by this Code, that such insurance will 16    be maintained throughout the period for which the motor 17    vehicle shall be registered, and that neither the owner, 18    nor any person operating the motor vehicle with the 19    owner's permission, shall operate the motor vehicle unless 20    the required insurance is in effect. If the person signing 21    the affirmation is not the sole owner of the vehicle, such 22    person shall be deemed to have affirmed on behalf of all 23    the owners of the vehicle. If the person signing the 24    affirmation is not an owner of the vehicle, such person 25    shall be deemed to have affirmed on behalf of the owner or 26    owners of the vehicle. The lack of signature on the   HB1768- 51 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    application shall not in any manner exempt the owner or 2    owners from any provisions, requirements or penalties of 3    this Code. 4    (b) When such application refers to a new vehicle 5purchased from a dealer the application shall be accompanied 6by a Manufacturer's Statement of Origin from the dealer, and a 7statement showing any lien retained by the dealer.8(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21; 102-1069, eff. 7-1-23.) 9    (625 ILCS 5/6-106)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 6-106)10    Sec. 6-106. Application for license or instruction permit. 11    (a) Every application for any permit or license authorized 12to be issued under this Code shall be made upon a form 13furnished by the Secretary of State. Every application shall 14be accompanied by the proper fee and payment of such fee shall 15entitle the applicant to not more than 3 attempts to pass the 16examination within a period of one year after the date of 17application. 18    (b) Every application shall state the legal name, zip 19code, date of birth, sex, and residence address of the 20applicant; briefly describe the applicant; state whether the 21applicant has theretofore been licensed as a driver, and, if 22so, when and by what state or country, and whether any such 23license has ever been cancelled, suspended, revoked or 24refused, and, if so, the date and reason for such 25cancellation, suspension, revocation or refusal; shall include   HB1768- 52 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1an affirmation by the applicant that all information set forth 2is true and correct; and shall bear the applicant's signature. 3In addition to the residence address, the Secretary may allow 4the applicant to provide a mailing address. In the case of an 5applicant who is a judicial officer, official, or peace 6officer, the Secretary may allow the applicant to provide an 7office or work address in lieu of a residence or mailing 8address. The application form may also require the statement 9of such additional relevant information as the Secretary of 10State shall deem necessary to determine the applicant's 11competency and eligibility. The Secretary of State may, in his 12discretion, by rule or regulation, provide that an application 13for a drivers license or permit may include a suitable 14photograph of the applicant in the form prescribed by the 15Secretary, and he may further provide that each drivers 16license shall include a photograph of the driver. The 17Secretary of State may utilize a photograph process or system 18most suitable to deter alteration or improper reproduction of 19a drivers license and to prevent substitution of another photo 20thereon. 21    For the purposes of this subsection (b): , 22    "Official" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 5 of 23the Public Safety and Justice Privacy Act. 24    "Peace peace officer" means any person who by virtue of 25his or her office or public employment is vested by law with a 26duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for a   HB1768- 53 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1violation of any penal statute of this State, whether that 2duty extends to all violations or is limited to specific 3violations. 4    (b-1) Every application shall state the social security 5number of the applicant; except if the applicant is applying 6for a standard driver's license and, on the date of 7application, is ineligible for a social security number, then:8        (1) if the applicant has documentation, issued by the 9    United States Department of Homeland Security, authorizing 10    the applicant's presence in this country, the applicant 11    shall provide such documentation instead of a social 12    security number; and13        (2) if the applicant does not have documentation 14    described in paragraph (1), the applicant shall provide, 15    instead of a social security number, the following:16            (A) documentation establishing that the applicant 17        has resided in this State for a period in excess of one 18        year;19            (B) a passport validly issued to the applicant 20        from the applicant's country of citizenship or a 21        consular identification document validly issued to the 22        applicant by a consulate of that country as defined in 23        Section 5 of the Consular Identification Document Act, 24        as long as such documents are either unexpired or 25        presented by an applicant within 2 years of its 26        expiration date; and   HB1768- 54 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1            (C) a social security card, if the applicant has a 2        social security number. 3    (b-3) Upon the first issuance of a request for proposals 4for a digital driver's license and identification card 5issuance and facial recognition system issued after January 1, 62020 (the effective date of Public Act 101-513), and upon 7implementation of a new or revised system procured pursuant to 8that request for proposals, the Secretary shall permit 9applicants to choose between "male", "female" or "non-binary" 10when designating the applicant's sex on the driver's license 11application form. The sex designated by the applicant shall be 12displayed on the driver's license issued to the applicant. 13    (b-5) Every applicant for a REAL ID compliant driver's 14license or permit shall provide proof of lawful status in the 15United States as defined in 6 CFR 37.3, as amended. 16    (c) The application form shall include a notice to the 17applicant of the registration obligations of sex offenders 18under the Sex Offender Registration Act. The notice shall be 19provided in a form and manner prescribed by the Secretary of 20State. For purposes of this subsection (c), "sex offender" has 21the meaning ascribed to it in Section 2 of the Sex Offender 22Registration Act. 23    (d) Any male United States citizen or immigrant who 24applies for any permit or license authorized to be issued 25under this Code or for a renewal of any permit or license, and 26who is at least 18 years of age but less than 26 years of age,   HB1768- 55 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1must be registered in compliance with the requirements of the 2federal Military Selective Service Act. The Secretary of State 3must forward in an electronic format the necessary personal 4information regarding the applicants identified in this 5subsection (d) to the Selective Service System. The 6applicant's signature on the application serves as an 7indication that the applicant either has already registered 8with the Selective Service System or that he is authorizing 9the Secretary to forward to the Selective Service System the 10necessary information for registration. The Secretary must 11notify the applicant at the time of application that his 12signature constitutes consent to registration with the 13Selective Service System, if he is not already registered. 14    (e) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, for each original 15or renewal driver's license application under this Code, the 16Secretary shall inquire as to whether the applicant is a 17veteran for purposes of issuing a driver's license with a 18veteran designation under subsection (e-5) of Section 6-110 of 19this Code. The acceptable forms of proof shall include, but 20are not limited to, Department of Defense form DD-214, 21Department of Defense form DD-256 for applicants who did not 22receive a form DD-214 upon the completion of initial basic 23training, Department of Defense form DD-2 (Retired), an 24identification card issued under the federal Veterans 25Identification Card Act of 2015, or a United States Department 26of Veterans Affairs summary of benefits letter. If the   HB1768- 56 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1document cannot be stamped, the Illinois Department of 2Veterans' Affairs shall provide a certificate to the veteran 3to provide to the Secretary of State. The Illinois Department 4of Veterans' Affairs shall advise the Secretary as to what 5other forms of proof of a person's status as a veteran are 6acceptable.7    For each applicant who is issued a driver's license with a 8veteran designation, the Secretary shall provide the 9Department of Veterans' Affairs with the applicant's name, 10address, date of birth, gender and such other demographic 11information as agreed to by the Secretary and the Department. 12The Department may take steps necessary to confirm the 13applicant is a veteran. If after due diligence, including 14writing to the applicant at the address provided by the 15Secretary, the Department is unable to verify the applicant's 16veteran status, the Department shall inform the Secretary, who 17shall notify the applicant that he or she must confirm status 18as a veteran, or the driver's license will be cancelled. 19    For purposes of this subsection (e):20    "Armed forces" means any of the Armed Forces of the United 21States, including a member of any reserve component or 22National Guard unit. 23    "Veteran" means a person who has served in the armed 24forces and was discharged or separated under honorable 25conditions. 26    (f) An applicant who is eligible for Gold Star license   HB1768- 57 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1plates under Section 3-664 of this Code may apply for an 2original or renewal driver's license with space for a 3designation as a Gold Star Family. The Secretary may waive any 4fee for this application. If the Secretary does not waive the 5fee, any fee charged to the applicant must be deposited into 6the Illinois Veterans Assistance Fund. The Secretary is 7authorized to issue rules to implement this subsection. 8(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 103-210, eff. 7-1-24; 9103-933, eff. 1-1-25.) 10    (625 ILCS 5/6-110)11    Sec. 6-110. Licenses issued to drivers. 12    (a) The Secretary of State shall issue to every qualifying 13applicant a driver's license as applied for, which license 14shall bear a distinguishing number assigned to the licensee, 15the legal name, signature, zip code, date of birth, residence 16address, and a brief description of the licensee. 17    Licenses issued shall also indicate the classification and 18the restrictions under Section 6-104 of this Code. The 19Secretary may adopt rules to establish informational 20restrictions that can be placed on the driver's license 21regarding specific conditions of the licensee.22    A driver's license issued may, in the discretion of the 23Secretary, include a suitable photograph of a type prescribed 24by the Secretary. 25    (a-1) If the licensee is less than 18 years of age, unless   HB1768- 58 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1one of the exceptions in subsection (a-2) apply, the license 2shall, as a matter of law, be invalid for the operation of any 3motor vehicle during the following times:4        (A) Between 11:00 p.m. Friday and 6:00 a.m. Saturday;5        (B) Between 11:00 p.m. Saturday and 6:00 a.m. on 6    Sunday; and7        (C) Between 10:00 p.m. on Sunday to Thursday, 8    inclusive, and 6:00 a.m. on the following day.9    (a-2) The driver's license of a person under the age of 18 10shall not be invalid as described in subsection (a-1) of this 11Section if the licensee under the age of 18 was:12        (1) accompanied by the licensee's parent or guardian 13    or other person in custody or control of the minor;14        (2) on an errand at the direction of the minor's 15    parent or guardian, without any detour or stop;16        (3) in a motor vehicle involved in interstate travel;17        (4) going to or returning home from an employment 18    activity, without any detour or stop;19        (5) involved in an emergency;20        (6) going to or returning home from, without any 21    detour or stop, an official school, religious, or other 22    recreational activity supervised by adults and sponsored 23    by a government or governmental agency, a civic 24    organization, or another similar entity that takes 25    responsibility for the licensee, without any detour or 26    stop;  HB1768- 59 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1        (7) exercising First Amendment rights protected by the 2    United States Constitution, such as the free exercise of 3    religion, freedom of speech, and the right of assembly; or4        (8) married or had been married or is an emancipated 5    minor under the Emancipation of Minors Act.6    (a-2.5) The driver's license of a person who is 17 years of 7age and has been licensed for at least 12 months is not invalid 8as described in subsection (a-1) of this Section while the 9licensee is participating as an assigned driver in a Safe 10Rides program that meets the following criteria: 11        (1) the program is sponsored by the Boy Scouts of 12    America or another national public service organization; 13    and14        (2) the sponsoring organization carries liability 15    insurance covering the program. 16    (a-3) If a graduated driver's license holder over the age 17of 18 committed an offense against traffic regulations 18governing the movement of vehicles or any violation of Section 196-107 or Section 12-603.1 of this Code in the 6 months prior to 20the graduated driver's license holder's 18th birthday, and was 21subsequently convicted of the offense, the provisions of 22subsection (a-1) shall continue to apply until such time as a 23period of 6 consecutive months has elapsed without an 24additional violation and subsequent conviction of an offense 25against traffic regulations governing the movement of vehicles 26or Section 6-107 or Section 12-603.1 of this Code.   HB1768- 60 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1    (a-4) If an applicant for a driver's license or 2instruction permit has a current identification card issued by 3the Secretary of State, the Secretary may require the 4applicant to utilize the same residence address and name on 5the identification card, driver's license, and instruction 6permit records maintained by the Secretary. The Secretary may 7promulgate rules to implement this provision. 8    (a-5) If an applicant for a driver's license is an 9employee of the Department of Children and Family Services 10with a job title of "Child Protection Specialist Trainee", 11"Child Protection Specialist", "Child Protection Advanced 12Specialist", "Child Welfare Specialist Trainee", "Child 13Welfare Specialist", or "Child Welfare Advanced Specialist" or 14a judicial officer or a peace officer, the applicant may elect 15to have his or her office or work address listed on the license 16instead of the applicant's residence or mailing address. The 17Secretary of State shall adopt rules to implement this 18subsection (a-5). 19    For the purposes of this subsection (a-5): , 20    "Official" has the meaning ascribed to it in Section 5 of 21the Public Safety and Justice Privacy Act. 22    "Peace peace officer" means any person who by virtue of 23his or her office or public employment is vested by law with a 24duty to maintain public order or to make arrests for a 25violation of any penal statute of this State, whether that 26duty extends to all violations or is limited to specific   HB1768- 61 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1violations. 2    (b) Until the Secretary of State establishes a First 3Person Consent organ and tissue donor registry under Section 46-117 of this Code, the Secretary of State shall provide a 5format on the reverse of each driver's license issued which 6the licensee may use to execute a document of gift conforming 7to the provisions of the Illinois Anatomical Gift Act. The 8format shall allow the licensee to indicate the gift intended, 9whether specific organs, any organ, or the entire body, and 10shall accommodate the signatures of the donor and 2 witnesses. 11The Secretary shall also inform each applicant or licensee of 12this format, describe the procedure for its execution, and may 13offer the necessary witnesses; provided that in so doing, the 14Secretary shall advise the applicant or licensee that he or 15she is under no compulsion to execute a document of gift. A 16brochure explaining this method of executing an anatomical 17gift document shall be given to each applicant or licensee. 18The brochure shall advise the applicant or licensee that he or 19she is under no compulsion to execute a document of gift, and 20that he or she may wish to consult with family, friends, or 21clergy before doing so. The Secretary of State may undertake 22additional efforts, including education and awareness 23activities, to promote organ and tissue donation. 24    (c) The Secretary of State shall designate on each 25driver's license issued a space where the licensee may place a 26sticker or decal of the uniform size as the Secretary may   HB1768- 62 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1specify, which sticker or decal may indicate in appropriate 2language that the owner of the license carries an Emergency 3Medical Information Card. 4    The sticker may be provided by any person, hospital, 5school, medical group, or association interested in assisting 6in implementing the Emergency Medical Information Card, but 7shall meet the specifications as the Secretary may by rule or 8regulation require. 9    (d) The Secretary of State shall designate on each 10driver's license issued a space where the licensee may 11indicate his blood type and RH factor. 12    (e) The Secretary of State shall provide that each 13original or renewal driver's license issued to a licensee 14under 21 years of age shall be of a distinct nature from those 15driver's licenses issued to individuals 21 years of age and 16older. The color designated for driver's licenses for 17licensees under 21 years of age shall be at the discretion of 18the Secretary of State. 19    (e-1) The Secretary shall provide that each driver's 20license issued to a person under the age of 21 displays the 21date upon which the person becomes 18 years of age and the date 22upon which the person becomes 21 years of age. 23    (e-3) The General Assembly recognizes the need to identify 24military veterans living in this State for the purpose of 25ensuring that they receive all of the services and benefits to 26which they are legally entitled, including health care   HB1768- 63 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1healthcare, education assistance, and job placement. To assist 2the State in identifying these veterans and delivering these 3vital services and benefits, the Secretary of State is 4authorized to issue drivers' licenses with the word "veteran" 5appearing on the face of the licenses. This authorization is 6predicated on the unique status of veterans. The Secretary may 7not issue any other driver's license which identifies an 8occupation, status, affiliation, hobby, or other unique 9characteristics of the license holder which is unrelated to 10the purpose of the driver's license.11    (e-5) Beginning on or before July 1, 2015, the Secretary 12of State shall designate a space on each original or renewal 13driver's license where, at the request of the applicant, the 14word "veteran" shall be placed. The veteran designation shall 15be available to a person identified as a veteran under 16subsection (e) of Section 6-106 of this Code who was 17discharged or separated under honorable conditions. 18    (e-7) Upon providing the required documentation, at the 19request of the applicant, the driver's license may reflect 20Gold Star Family designation. The Secretary shall designate a 21space on each original or renewal driver's license for such 22designation. This designation shall be available to a person 23eligible for Gold Star license plates under subsection (f) of 24Section 6-106 of this Code. 25    (f) The Secretary of State shall inform all Illinois 26licensed commercial motor vehicle operators of the   HB1768- 64 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1requirements of the Uniform Commercial Driver License Act, 2Article V of this Chapter, and shall make provisions to insure 3that all drivers, seeking to obtain a commercial driver's 4license, be afforded an opportunity prior to April 1, 1992, to 5obtain the license. The Secretary is authorized to extend 6driver's license expiration dates, and assign specific times, 7dates and locations where these commercial driver's tests 8shall be conducted. Any applicant, regardless of the current 9expiration date of the applicant's driver's license, may be 10subject to any assignment by the Secretary. Failure to comply 11with the Secretary's assignment may result in the applicant's 12forfeiture of an opportunity to receive a commercial driver's 13license prior to April 1, 1992. 14    (g) The Secretary of State shall designate on a driver's 15license issued, a space where the licensee may indicate that 16he or she has drafted a living will in accordance with the 17Illinois Living Will Act or a durable power of attorney for 18health care in accordance with the Illinois Power of Attorney 19Act. 20    (g-1) The Secretary of State, in his or her discretion, 21may designate on each driver's license issued a space where 22the licensee may place a sticker or decal, issued by the 23Secretary of State, of uniform size as the Secretary may 24specify, that shall indicate in appropriate language that the 25owner of the license has renewed his or her driver's license. 26    (h) A person who acts in good faith in accordance with the   HB1768- 65 -LRB104 07775 BDA 17820 b1terms of this Section is not liable for damages in any civil 2action or subject to prosecution in any criminal proceeding 3for his or her act. 4    (i) The Secretary shall designate a space on each original 5or renewal of a driver's license, at the request of the 6applicant, for a designation as a Gold Star Family. This 7designation shall be available to a person eligible for Gold 8Star license plates under subsection (f) of Section 6-106 of 9this Code. 10(Source: P.A. 103-888, eff. 8-9-24; 103-933, eff. 1-1-25; 11revised 11-26-24.) 12    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 13becoming law.